Hawaii, session 2026, SB3070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1. The following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 are appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii to the department of the attorney general for the purpose of satisfying claims for legislative relief as to the following named persons, firms, corporations, and entities, for claims against the State or its officers or employees, for the overpayment of taxes, or for refunds, reimbursements, payments of judgments or settlements, or other liabilities, in the amounts set forth opposite their names: JUDGMENTS AGAINST THE STATE                           AMOUNT AND SETTLEMENTS OF CLAIMS: 1.   MISCELLANEOUS CLAIMS: Joan Arakawa and Kevin Arakawa               $ 1,494.72 Steve Boucher and Judy Boucher              $ 1,102.00 Citibank NA                                 $       780.72 Silvia Frumento                             $ 1,425.12 Clarice H. Kam                              $       724.11 Maria Lundblad                              $   104,460.50 ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $   109,987.17 2.   DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND BIOSECURITY: United States Environmental Protection       $   151,132.00 Agency Region 9 v. State of Hawaii,            (Settlement) Department of Agriculture ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $   151,132.00 3.   DEPARTMENT OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL: Roynes J. Dural II v. State of Hawaii        $   420,833.00 Civil No. 1CCV-21-0001461, First Circuit       (Settlement) Alvin F. Jardine, III v. State of Hawaii     $   600,000.00 Civil No. 2SP16-1-000056, Second Circuit       (Settlement) ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $ 1,020,833.00 4.   DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION: Susan O'Gorman v. State of Hawaii,           $   600,000.00 Department of Public Safety                    (Settlement) Civil No. 1CCV-24-0000912, First Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $   600,000.00 5.   DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION: DOE Parents v. State of Hawaii,              $   500,000.00 Department of Education                       (Settlement) Civil No. 1CCV-22-0001456, First Circuit Victoria Ramos v. Hawaii State               $    36,951.86 Department of Education                       (Settlement) Civil No. 3CCV-23-0000394, Third Circuit South Point Investment Group, LLC v.         $   100,000.00 State of Hawaii                               (Settlement) Civil No. 3CCV-20-0000040, Third Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $   636,951.86 6.   DEPARTMENT OF HAWAIIAN HOME LANDS: William Kaholoaʻa Jr. v. Hawaiian Homes      $ 1,330,000.00 Commission, State of Hawaii                    (Settlement) Civil No. 2CCV-24-0000037, Second Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $ 1,330,000.00 7.   DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH: HELG Administrative Services, LLC v.         $   100,000.00 Department of Health                          (Settlement) Civil No. 1CC191000332, First Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $   100,000.00 8.   DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES: Tera Graves v. State of Hawaii,              $   600,000.00 Department of Human Services                   (Settlement) Civil No. 3CCV-19-0000022, Third Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $   600,000.00 9.   DEPARTMENT OF LAND AND NATURAL RESOURCES: Lolita Silva v. Nelson Alana,                $ 2,000,000.00 Civil No. 2CC121000778, Second Circuit         (Settlement) ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $ 2,000,000.00 10.  DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT: Thomas Cayetano v.                          $ 47,500.00 Department of Public Safety                    (Settlement) Civil No. 1CCV-22-0000179, First Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $    47,500.00 TOTAL (SECTION 1):                          $ 6,596,404.03 The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of the attorney general for the purposes of this Act. PART II SECTION 2. The following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 are appropriated out of the state highway fund for the purpose of satisfying claims for legislative relief as to the following named persons, for claims against the State or its officers or employees for payments of judgments or settlements, or other liabilities, in the amount set forth opposite their names: JUDGMENTS AGAINST THE STATE                           AMOUNT AND SETTLEMENTS OF CLAIMS: DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, HIGHWAYS DIVISION: Anacleto R. Battad v. Lawrence J. Dill       $ 1,100,000.00 Civil No. 5CC181000177, Fifth Circuit          (Settlement) The Estate of Matthew Louis Perreira v.      $   300,000.00 State of Hawaii                               (Settlement) Civil No. 2CCV-22-0000045, Second Circuit ______________ SUBTOTAL:                                   $ 1,400,000.00 TOTAL (SECTION 2):                          $ 1,400,000.00 The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation, highways division, for the purposes of this Act. PART III SECTION 3. The sums hereinabove may be paid to the respective persons, firms, corporations, or entities for the satisfaction or settlement of the respectively identified cases, and in several amounts hereinabove set forth or in lesser amounts deemed appropriate, upon checks issued by the comptroller; provided that departments shall obtain the approval of the attorney general before payment of any claim may be made. SECTION 4. Notwithstanding the sums hereinabove stated as interest upon judgments against the State, payment of interest shall be limited to the period from the date of the judgment, if applicable, to thirty days after the effective date of this Act, as provided in section 662-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for those cases to which the statute applies. SECTION 5. The appropriations made by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal period for which the appropriations are made; provided that all moneys from the appropriations that are unexpended and unencumbered as of June 30, 2027, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 6. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST